Massachusetts, session 194th, S1944.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection B of Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
adding the following subparagraph:-
(5) Amounts not to exceed $2,000 received by persons under age 60 as pensions from
employers, the United States, the State or any subdivision, or amounts not to exceed $12,500
received by persons age 60 or older as pensions from employers, the United States, the State or
any subdivision or as eligible retirement income.
For the purposes of this paragraph, "eligible retirement income" shall include
distributions received from qualified retirement plans defined in § 4974 of the federal Internal
Revenue Code ("IRC") [26 U.S.C. § 4974] or a successor provision, cash or deferred
arrangements described in IRC § 401(k) [26 U.S.C. § 401(k)] or a successor provision,
of 2

government deferred compensation plans described in IRC § 457 [26 U.S.C. § 457] or a
successor provision, dividends, capital gains, interest and rental income from real property less
deductible rental expenses. For purposes of this paragraph, eligible retirement income received
by spouses as joint tenants with right of survivorship or as tenants by the entirety shall be
deemed to have been received one-half by each.
of 2